Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 6

Industrial Banks and Industrial Investment Companies

45-5-601. Supervision and examination.

In addition to the supervision and examination for compliance with this chapter as herein provided, industrial banks and industrial investment companies shall also be supervised and examined as banks for the protection of holders of investment and thrift certificates. To that end, the commissioner shall have and exercise with respect to industrial banks and industrial investment companies, in addition to the other powers and duties conferred by this title, the powers and duties specified in §45-1-107 and in chapter 2, part 16 of this title, which part 16 shall be fully applicable to industrial banks and industrial investment companies.

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

45-5-602. Liquidation, dissolution, and reorganization of industrial banks.

Chapter 2, part 15 of this title, pertaining to the liquidation, dissolution and reorganization of state banks, is fully applicable to industrial banks and industrial investment companies.

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

45-5-603. Capital structure.

To be registered as an industrial bank and to be authorized to issue thrift certificates, an industrial bank must have the capital structure required of state banks.

To be registered as an industrial investment company and to be authorized to issue investment certificates, an industrial investment company must have a capital structure in keeping with the scope of its existing and proposed operations, as determined by the commissioner. In making the determinations, the commissioner shall consider the justification offered by the applicant in support of its existing or proposed capital structure; the amount of outstanding and proposed investment certificates of the applicant; the number and characteristics of any existing holders of the certificates and of the market contemplated for any proposed offering; the terms of any proposed offering; the assets and liabilities of the company; the history of profitability of the company; and any other factors deemed pertinent to the protection of investors in the certificates. In no event shall the commissioner require a capital structure for an industrial investment company less than that required for a comparable industrial loan and thrift company or more than that required for a comparable industrial bank.

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

45-5-604. Insurance of thrift certificates.

For the purpose of providing for the insurance of thrift certificates, chapter 2, part 8 of this title shall be fully applicable to qualified industrial banks and to thrift certificates issued by them, and for that purpose, the word “bank” as used in that part includes “industrial bank” and the word “deposit” as used in that part includes “thrift certificate.”

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

45-5-605. Issuance of thrift certificates.

An industrial bank shall not issue thrift certificates until and unless:

It is qualified for federal deposit insurance and its thrift certificates are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation;

It has filed the forms, documents and receipts to be used by it in the offering and sale of the thrift certificates with the commissioner; and

It has complied with all rules and orders of the commissioner governing the issuance of the thrift certificates by it.

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

45-5-606. Rules concerning investment and thrift certificates.

In addition to the other rulemaking powers conferred upon the commissioner by this title, the commissioner is authorized and directed to adopt rules governing the issuance, offering and sale of investment certificates by industrial investment companies or thrift certificates by industrial banks and all operations of industrial investment companies and industrial banks in connection therewith, in order to protect the interests of the holders of the certificates, including, but not limited to, the maintenance of appropriate reserves.

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

45-5-607. Applicability of laws pertaining to banks.

In order to protect the interests of holders of thrift certificates, in addition to the other provisions of chapters 1 and 2 of this title made applicable by this chapter to industrial banks, the following sections are applicable to industrial banks as to state banks generally: §§45-1-122;45-2-101 [repealed];45-2-103;45-2-203;45-2-207(a), (d) and (e);45-2-207(c), except the reference to “trust powers”;45-2-208, except that loan limits for industrial banks shall be controlled by §45-5-302, rather than §45-2-1102;45-2-209 [repealed];45-2-404;45-2-607, except that industrial banks may invest in obligations that satisfy the requirements of chapter 5 of this title; and45-2-616.

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Section 45-2-209, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 5.

Section 45-2-101, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2001, ch. 54, § 4.

45-5-608. Conversion of industrial loan and thrift companies.

Any industrial loan and thrift company holding a certificate of registration under this chapter may convert to an industrial bank or to an industrial investment company by meeting the qualifications for operating as an industrial bank or industrial investment company as provided in this chapter. The commissioner shall provide forms for applications for conversion and may adopt rules governing conversion.

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

45-5-609. Merger with state bank.

Any industrial loan and thrift company holding a certificate of registration under this chapter that has converted into an industrial bank may, with the approval of the commissioner, be merged into a state bank in accordance with the procedures contained in § 45-2-1304 if the following conditions are met:

The industrial loan and thrift company was legally chartered to transact business before 1930, and has, since its original incorporation, and prior to May 16, 1983, maintained branch offices in more than four (4) counties;

The industrial loan and thrift company has been registered continuously with the state of Tennessee since the first enactment of statutes regulating the industrial loan and thrift industry; and

The capital of the industrial loan and thrift company is, in the opinion of the commissioner, impaired or the company is, in the opinion of the commissioner, otherwise in an unsound condition as evidenced by a pending petition for corporate reorganization in bankruptcy or other similar legal proceeding.

The authority of the commissioner to approve the mergers authorized in subsection (a) shall extend only to those transactions for which a merger agreement has been filed with the commissioner on or before December 1, 1983.

The commissioner shall not approve any merger of an industrial bank into a state bank under this section unless the commissioner determines that the industrial bank will not be owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by any person who would not be otherwise qualified to own or acquire control in a state bank.

For a period of three (3) full years following the effective date of the merger of an industrial bank into a state bank, in those counties other than the county in which the principal office of a state bank is located, the state bank into which the industrial bank is merged may continue to operate only those branch offices of the original industrial loan and thrift company that were in existence and operating on January 1, 1983, and those branch offices for which, in the opinion of the commissioner, land acquisition and plans for construction were substantially complete on or before January 1, 1983.

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

45-5-610. Conversion of investment certificates to thrift certificates.

Any outstanding investment certificates of an industrial loan and thrift company or of an industrial investment company that converts to operation as an industrial bank or any outstanding investment certificates of an industrial bank may be converted to thrift certificates, if the certificates will be insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation and otherwise meet the requirements for thrift certificates provided in this chapter and of any applicable rules adopted by the commissioner.

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

45-5-611. Fees.

The commissioner is authorized and directed to adopt a schedule of fees to cover the reasonable costs of examination and supervision and of the processing of conversion applications provided for in this part. Failure to pay any such fee shall be cause for suspension or revocation of authority or denial of any application.

Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 20.

45-5-612. Out-of-state banks restricted — Compliance with § 45-5-609 required for all banks.

The general assembly finds and declares that the ownership of industrial banks by non-Tennessee bank holding companies or other non-Tennessee corporations is not of benefit to the people and economy of this state and will result in the drain of capital from Tennessee.

By July 5, 1984, any industrial bank owned by a bank holding company, or other company whose principal place of business is not in Tennessee, shall be divested by the company or liquidated and dissolved under § 45-2-1501(b), or shall be recertified by the commissioner as an industrial investment company, as defined in § 45-5-102, with the rights and powers of an industrial investment company, and shall no longer qualify as an industrial bank nor exercise any of the rights and powers of an industrial bank.

No industrial bank shall be created nor any industrial loan and thrift company or industrial investment company shall be converted to an industrial bank pursuant to § 45-5-608, or pursuant to any other provision of law unless the industrial bank, industrial loan and thrift company or industrial investment company satisfies the conditions set forth in § 45-5-609(a)(1) and (2).

If an application for organization as or conversion to an industrial bank is pending or the application has been approved for certification as an industrial bank, then any applicant or industrial bank that does not meet the requirements of this section and § 45-5-609 shall be recertified by May 5, 1984, by the commissioner as an industrial investment company as defined in § 45-5-102, with the rights and powers of an industrial investment corporation, and shall no longer qualify as an industrial bank nor exercise any of the rights and powers of an industrial bank, or shall be liquidated and dissolved under § 45-2-1501(b).

Subsection (c) applies to any and all industrial banks and applications for organization as or conversion to an industrial bank including, but not limited to, applications filed and approved prior to February 23, 1984; applications filed prior to but approved after February 23, 1984, and prior to April 5, 1984; applications filed before February 23, 1984, and pending on April 5, 1984; and applications filed and pending or filed and approved after February 23, 1984, and before April 5, 1984.

This section shall not be construed to alter, deny, void or otherwise affect the rights and powers of either an industrial bank meeting the requirements of § 45-5-609, or a state bank resulting from a merger provided for in § 45-5-609.

Acts 1984, ch. 513, §§ 1-5.

Compiler's Notes. Portions of this section concerning exempt institutions have been held to be inoperative. See Notes to Decisions, 1. Constitutionality, Citicorp Fin. Servs. Corp. v. Adams, 674 S.W.2d 705 (Tenn. 1984).